Maine, session 132, LD1187.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA c. 256-A, headnote is amended to read:
CHAPTER 256-A
REPORTING OF FIREARM FATALITIES AND, HOSPITALIZATIONS AND
MENTAL HEALTH ASSESSMENT DATA
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §1425, as amended by PL 2021, c. 676, Pt. A, §32, is further
amended by amending the section headnote to read:
§1425. Annual report on firearm fatalities and, hospitalizations and mental health
assessment data
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §1425, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 369, §1, is
amended to read:
C. Unintentional discharges, further separated by the ages of the victims; and
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §1425, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 676, Pt. A, §32, is
further amended to read:
2. Hospitalizations. Hospitalizations that occurred as a result of a firearm but did not
result in death.; and
Sec. 5. 22 MRSA §1425, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Risk assessments. The number of assessments by a medical practitioner performed
pursuant to Title 34-B, section 3862-A, the number of individuals assessed who received a
referral for mental health treatment and services and any aggregate demographic
information about the individuals assessed that can be released without risking individual
identification.
Page 1 - 132LR1802(09)